Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.060

Record of proceedings.

The secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings. A part of the record shall consist of a register of all applicants for credentialing under this chapter and the results of each application.

[ 1991 c 3 s 261; 1987 c 150 s 66.]